Hawaii statutes.
§328-27 Perishables destroyed when.
Whenever the director of health or any of the director's agents find in any
room, building, vehicle of transportation, or other structure, any meat,
seafood, poultry, vegetable, fruit, or other perishable articles which are
unsound, or contain any filthy, decomposed, or putrid substance, or that may be
poisonous or deleterious to health or otherwise unsafe, the same being hereby
declared to be a nuisance, the director or any of the director's agents, shall
forthwith condemn or destroy the same, or in any other manner render the same
unsalable as human food. [L 1941, c 318, pt of §22; RL 1945, §2228; RL 1955,
§51-28; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §328-27; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next